Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. Authorized Delegates.

Sec. 06.55.301.
Relationship between licensee and authorized delegate.

A contract between a money services licensee and an authorized delegate must require the authorized delegate to operate in full compliance with this chapter. The money services licensee shall furnish in a record to each authorized delegate policies and procedures sufficient for compliance with this chapter.

An authorized delegate shall remit all money owing to the money services licensee under the terms of the contract between the money services licensee and the authorized delegate. In this subsection, “remit” means to make direct payments of money to a money services licensee or its representative authorized to receive money or to deposit money in a bank in an account specified by the money services licensee.

If a money services license is suspended or revoked or a money services licensee does not renew its money services license, the department shall notify all authorized delegates of the money services licensee whose names are in a record filed with the department of the suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal. After notice is sent or publication is made, an authorized delegate shall immediately cease to provide money services as an authorized delegate of the money services licensee.

An authorized delegate may not provide money services outside the scope of activity permissible under the contract between the authorized delegate and the money services licensee, except activity in which the authorized delegate is authorized to engage under AS

06.55.101

—

06.55.204

. An authorized delegate of a money services licensee holds in trust for the benefit of the money services licensee all money net of fees received from money transmission.

An authorized delegate may not use a subdelegate to conduct money services on behalf of a money services licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, see 3 AAC 13, art. 2.

Sec. 06.55.302.
Unauthorized activities.

A person may not act as an authorized delegate for, or otherwise provide money services on behalf of, a person who does not hold a money services license under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, see 3 AAC 13, art. 2.